Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 60
COMMUNITY COLLEGES AND
OCCUPATIONAL EDUCATION

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS - STATE BOARD

PART 2 STATE SYSTEM OF COMMUNITY
AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

PART 3 OCCUPATIONAL EDUCATION

PART 4 LOCAL JUNIOR COLLEGES

PART 5 MISCELLANEOUS

PART 6 WORKPLACE LITERACY PROGRAMS

PART 7 PRIVATE OCCUPATIONAL
SCHOOL DIVISION

PART 8 AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGES

PART 9 ACCELERATED EDUCATION AND SKILLS TRAINING

PART 10 MANUFACTURING CAREER PATHWAY

PART 11 WORKING GROUP FOR THE TRANSFER OF APPRENTICESHIP CREDIT TO COLLEGE CREDIT